Alaska statutes. Title 34. Property.
Article 3. Landlord Obligations.

Sec. 34.03.070.
Security deposits and prepaid rent.

Except as provided in (h) of this section, a landlord may not demand or receive prepaid rent or a security deposit, however denominated, in an amount or value in excess of two months’ periodic rent. This section does not apply to rental units where the rent exceeds $2,000 a month.

Upon termination of the tenancy, property or money held by the landlord as prepaid rent or as a security deposit may be applied to the payment of accrued rent and the amount of damages that the landlord has suffered by reason of the tenant’s noncompliance with AS

34.03.120

. The accrued rent and damages must be itemized by the landlord in a written notice mailed to the tenant’s last known address within the time limit prescribed by (g) of this section, together with the amount due the tenant. In this subsection, “damages”

means deterioration of the premises and, if applicable, of the contents of the premises;

does not include deterioration

that is the result of normal wear and tear;

caused by the landlord’s failure to prepare for expected conditions or by the landlord’s failure to comply with an obligation of the landlord imposed by this chapter.

All money paid to the landlord by the tenant as prepaid rent or as a security deposit in a lease or rental agreement shall be promptly deposited by the landlord, wherever practicable, in a trust account in a bank, savings and loan association, or licensed escrow agent, and the landlord shall provide to the tenant the terms and conditions under which the prepaid rent or security deposit or portions of them may be withheld by the landlord. Nothing in this chapter prohibits the landlord from commingling prepaid rents and security deposits in a single financial account; however, the landlord shall separately account for prepaid rent and security deposits received from each tenant. The landlord may not commingle prepaid rent and security deposits with other funds. The landlord may not use money held for one tenant in a trust account to

refund the security deposit of another tenant;

apply to the payment of another tenant’s accrued rent;

apply to damages suffered by the landlord because of another tenant’s noncompliance with AS

34.03.120

.

If the landlord wilfully fails to comply with (b) of this section, the tenant may recover an amount not to exceed twice the actual amount withheld.

This section does not preclude a landlord or tenant from recovering other damages to which either may be entitled under this chapter.

The holder of the landlord’s interest in the premises at the time of the termination of the tenancy is bound by this section.

If the landlord or tenant gives notice that complies with AS

34.03.290

, the landlord shall mail the written notice and refund required by (b) of this section within 14 days after the tenancy is terminated and possession is delivered by the tenant, except the landlord shall have 30 days after the tenancy is terminated to mail the refund if costs are deducted for damages that the landlord has suffered because of the tenant’s noncompliance with AS

34.03.120

. If the tenant does not give notice that complies with AS

34.03.290

, the landlord shall mail the written notice and refund required by (b) of this section within 30 days after the tenancy is terminated, possession is delivered by the tenant, or the landlord becomes aware that the dwelling unit is abandoned. If the landlord does not know the mailing address of the tenant, but knows or has reason to know how to contact the tenant to give the notice required by (b) of this section, the landlord shall make a reasonable effort to deliver the notice and refund to the tenant.

Notwithstanding the limitation on the amount of prepaid rent or security deposit in (a) of this section, a landlord may demand or receive an additional security deposit from a tenant who has a pet on the premises that is not a service animal. The additional security deposit

may not exceed the periodic rent for one month; and

shall be accounted for separately from prepaid rent or a security deposit received under (a) of this section and may be applied only to the amount of damages that are directly related to the pet of the tenant.

In this section,

“normal wear and tear” means deterioration that occurs from the intended use of the rental unit and without negligence, carelessness, accident, misuse, or abuse of the premises or contents by the tenant, members of the household of the tenant, or the invitees or guests of the tenant;

“service animal” means an animal that is individually trained to do work or perform tasks that are directly related to and for the benefit of an individual with a disability, including a physical, sensory, psychiatric, intellectual, or other mental disability.

History.

(§ 1 ch 10 SLA 1974; am §§ 1, 2 ch 20 SLA 1982; am §§ 14, 15 ch 121 SLA 1994; am §§ 2 — 6 ch 27 SLA 2014)

Editor’s notes. —

Sec. 13, ch. 27, SLA 2014 provides that the 2014 changes to (a) — (c) and (g) made in that act and subsections (h) and (i), added by that act, “apply to a residential rental agreement for a period beginning on or after September 15, 2014.”

Sec. 34.03.080.
Disclosure.

The landlord or a person authorized to enter into a rental agreement on behalf of the landlord shall disclose to the tenant in writing at or before the commencement of the tenancy the name and address of

the person authorized to manage the premises; and

an owner of the premises or a person authorized to act for and on behalf of the owner for the purpose of service of process and for the purpose of receiving and receipting for notices and demands.

The information required to be furnished by this section shall be kept current and this section extends to and is enforceable against any successor landlord, owner, or manager.

A person who fails to comply with (a) of this section becomes an agent of each person who is a landlord for the purpose of

service of process and receiving and receipting for notices and demands; and

performing the obligations of the landlord under this chapter and under the rental agreement and expending or making available for the purpose all rent collected from the premises.

A mobile home park operator shall disclose fully in writing all capital improvements that will be required to be made by the tenant including but not limited to skirting or utility hook-ups, before entering into a rental agreement.

History.

(§ 1 ch 10 SLA 1974; am § 3 ch 138 SLA 1976)

Sec. 34.03.090.
Landlord to supply possession of the dwelling unit.

At the commencement of the term the landlord shall deliver possession of the premises to the tenant in compliance with the rental agreement and AS

34.03.100

. The landlord may, after serving a notice to quit under AS

09.45.100

—

09.45.105

to a person who is wrongfully in possession,

bring an action for possession against any person wrongfully in possession; and

recover the damages provided in AS

34.03.290

.

The tenant shall acknowledge or verify by the tenant’s signature the accuracy of the premises condition statement and contents inventory prepared under AS

34.03.020(e)

. The premises condition statement and contents inventory

may be used by the landlord or tenant as the basis

to determine whether prepaid rent or a security deposit shall be applied to the payment of damages to the premises when authorized by AS

34.03.070(b)

; and

to compute the recovery of other damages to which the parties may be entitled under this chapter; and

is, in an action initiated by a party to recover damages or to obtain other relief to which a party may be entitled under this chapter, presumptive evidence of the condition of the premises and its contents at the commencement of the term of the period of occupancy covered by the rental agreement.

History.

(§ 1 ch 10 SLA 1974; am §§ 16, 17 ch 121 SLA 1994; am § 7 ch 27 SLA 2014)

Editor’s notes. —

Sec. 13, ch. 27, SLA 2014 provides that the 2014 changes to (b) of this section made in that act “apply to a residential rental agreement for a period beginning on or after September 15, 2014.”

Sec. 34.03.100.
Landlord to maintain fit premises.

The landlord shall

make all repairs and do whatever is necessary to put and keep the premises in a fit and habitable condition;

keep all common areas of the premises in a clean and safe condition;

maintain in good and safe working order and condition all electrical, plumbing, sanitary, heating, ventilating, air-conditioning, kitchen, and other facilities and appliances, including elevators, supplied or required to be supplied by the landlord;

provide and maintain appropriate receptacles and conveniences for the removal of ashes, garbage, rubbish, and other waste incidental to the occupancy of the dwelling unit and arrange for their removal;

supply running water and reasonable amounts of hot water and heat at all times, insofar as energy conditions permit, except where

the building that includes the dwelling unit is so constructed that heat or hot water is generated by an installation within the exclusive control of the tenant and supplied by a direct public utility connection; or

the premises do not have a well or water provided by a direct public utility connection and the rental agreement specifically states that the duty of the landlord to supply running water or hot water to the premises is waived by the tenant;

if requested by the tenant, provide and maintain locks and furnish keys reasonably adequate to ensure safety to the tenant’s person and property; and

provide smoke detection devices and carbon monoxide detection devices as required under AS

18.70.095

.

A landlord of a single family residence located in an undeveloped rural area or located where public sewer or water service has never been connected is not liable for a breach of (a)(3) or (5) of this section if the dwelling unit at the beginning of the rental agreement did not have running water, hot water, sewage, or sanitary facilities from a private system.

The landlord and tenant of a one- or two-family residence may agree in writing that the tenant perform the landlord’s duties specified in (a)(4), (5), (6), and (7) of this section. A tenant may agree to perform the duties specified in (a)(3) of this section in rental units where the rent exceeds $2,000 a month. They may also agree in writing that the tenant perform specified repairs, maintenance tasks, alterations, and remodeling, but the tenant may not agree to maintain elevators in good and safe working order. Agreements are allowed under this subsection only if the transaction is entered into in good faith and not for the purpose of evading the obligations of the landlord.

The landlord and tenant of a dwelling unit other than a single family residence may agree that the tenant is to perform specified repairs, maintenance tasks, alterations, or remodeling only if

the agreement of the parties is entered into in good faith and not for the purpose of evading the obligations of the landlord and is set out in a separate writing signed by the parties and supported by adequate consideration; and

the agreement does not diminish or affect the obligation of the landlord to other tenants in the premises.

The landlord may not treat performance of a separate agreement described in (d) of this section as a condition to an obligation or performance of a rental agreement.

History.

(§ 1 ch 10 SLA 1974; am §§ 3, 4 ch 129 SLA 1988; am § 18 ch 121 SLA 1994; am § 7 ch 60 SLA 2004; am § 8 ch 27 SLA 2014)

Cross references. —

For landlord’s duty to provide smoke and carbon monoxide detectors, see AS

18.70.095

.

Editor’s notes. —

Sec. 13, ch. 27, SLA 2014 provides that the 2014 changes to (a) of this section made in that act “apply to a residential rental agreement for a period beginning on or after September 15, 2014.”

Sec. 34.03.110.
Limitation of liability.

Unless otherwise agreed, a landlord who conveys premises that include a dwelling unit subject to a rental agreement in a good faith sale to a bona fide purchaser is relieved of liability under the rental agreement and this chapter as to events occurring subsequent to written notice to the tenant of the conveyance. However,

the landlord remains liable to the tenant for the property and money to which the tenant is entitled under AS

34.03.070

, unless the property and money are specifically assigned to and accepted by the purchaser; and

the provisions of

a premises condition statement prepared under AS

34.03.020(e)

between the landlord and the tenant remains valid as between the purchaser and the tenant until a new premises condition statement is entered into between the purchaser and the tenant; and

a contents inventory prepared under AS

34.03.020(e)

between the landlord and the tenant remains valid as between the purchaser and the tenant for the contents remaining on the premises after the conveyance of the premises until a new contents inventory is entered into between the purchaser and the tenant.

Unless otherwise agreed, a manager of premises that include a dwelling unit is relieved of liability under the rental agreement and this chapter as to events occurring after written notice to the tenant of the termination of the person’s management.

History.

(§ 1 ch 10 SLA 1974; am § 19 ch 121 SLA 1994)

Sec. 34.03.115.
[Renumbered as AS 34.05.025.]